Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 6

Disbursement and Investment of State Funds

9-4-601. Disbursements, investments and transfers of funds, generally.

No money shall be drawn from the state treasury except in accordance with appropriations duly authorized by law. Every disbursement from the state treasury, except as hereinafter provided, shall be upon the authorization of the commissioner of finance and administration, which authorization shall be in the form of a warrant, drawn in favor of the payee, and the warrant shall, upon being signed by the commissioner and delivered to the payee, become a draft on the treasury of the state. Electronic transfer of funds, in lieu of a warrant, may be utilized when such use is deemed by the commissioner and the state treasurer to be in the best interest of the state. When this method of disbursement is utilized, the commissioner shall authorize such transfer in writing, and the state treasurer shall accept such written advice in lieu of a warrant.

Notwithstanding title 66, chapter 29, warrants, drafts, and checks drawn on the state treasury that have not been redeemed within twelve (12) months of issue date shall be cancelled and written off the state's books, with the funds reverting to the fund of issue. Subsequent claims by the payee of said instruments shall be honored upon receipt of documentation to substantiate the claim. The commissioner of finance and administration and the state treasurer shall ensure the state's compliance with the unclaimed property law.

The commissioner may, with the approval of the state treasurer and the comptroller of the treasury, authorize warrants as set forth in subsection (a) to be issued on the commissioner's behalf by another state official or by a third party pursuant to contract with the state. In exercising discretion pursuant to this subsection (b), the commissioner shall set out in writing such commissioner's authorization and the limitations and restrictions upon that authorization.

All state money in any depository of the state government shall stand on the books of the depository to the credit of the state treasurer. Transfer of funds between depositories, in order to facilitate a concentration of funds for immediate investment, or payment of state obligations pursuant to subsection (a), shall be made by electronic transfer of funds or in accordance with such other procedures authorized by the state treasurer and approved by the commissioner and the comptroller of the treasury.

The state treasurer is specifically authorized to purchase investments which are otherwise authorized by law or by authority delegated to the state treasurer pursuant to § 9-4-602 by electronic transfer of funds or in accordance with such other procedures authorized by the state treasurer and approved by the commissioner and the comptroller of the treasury.

Whenever electronic transfer of funds is used for the purpose authorized by this section, such electronic funds transfer shall be made through the federal reserve system upon instructions of the state treasurer confirmed by written documentation, or by magnetic tape, disc or other medium designed for electronic communication. Copies of such written documentation or electronic communication shall be furnished immediately to the commissioner and shall contain a full description of the transaction in a form acceptable to the commissioner.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 41; 1986, ch. 551, § 1; 2013, ch. 454, § 30.

Cross-References. Restrictions on expending public funds for advertising or public relations, §9-4-609.

Attorney General Opinions. As a general matter, absent the enactment of an appropriations bill for a fiscal year, there is no authority in most circumstances for the state to spend money, whether generated by the state's own taxing powers or received from other sources such as the federal government, OAG 00-083, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 86 (5/4/00).

A state agency may not make an expenditure of funds from the state treasury which has not been appropriated by the legislature, and a statutory grant of rule-making authority which is not itself an appropriation may not be used to circumvent this constitutional and statutory restriction, OAG 04-142, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 158 (9/01/04).

9-4-602. Investment of state funds.

It is the policy of the state of Tennessee that all funds in the state treasury shall be invested by the state treasurer to the extent practicable.

Investments shall be made in accordance with policy guidelines approved by resolution of the state funding board, which may authorize investment in any of the following:

Bonds, notes and treasury bills of the United States or other obligations guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States or any of its agencies;

Obligations guaranteed as to principal and interest by the federal home loan mortgage corporation, federal national mortgage association, student loan marketing association and other United States government-sponsored corporations;

Repurchase agreements for obligations of the United States or its agencies;

Certificates of deposit in banks and savings and loan associations recognized as state depositories pursuant to § 9-4-107; provided, that certificates of deposit are collateralized in accordance with § 9-4-403;

Prime commercial paper which shall be rated in the highest category by at least two (2) commercial paper rating services;

Prime banker's acceptances that are eligible for purchase by the federal reserve system; and

Securities lending agreements whereby securities may be loaned for a fee; provided, that eligible collateral as defined in § 9-4-103 whose market value is at least equal to one hundred two percent (102%) of the value of the borrowed securities shall be required for each loan. For purposes of this provision, “eligible collateral” includes cash collateral which is equal to at least one hundred percent (100%) of the market value of the borrowed securities. Institutions and other entities governed by the board of trustees of the University of Tennessee or the board of regents do not have the authority to use the investment vehicle established pursuant to this subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i)(g ).

Investment in the instruments authorized in subdivisions (a)(1)(B)(i)(e )-(g ) shall be prohibited until the state funding board adopts a resolution approving policy guidelines authorizing use of such investment instruments. Such policy guidelines shall include limitations on the amount of funds which may be invested in instruments authorized pursuant to subdivisions (a)(1)(B)(i)(e )-(g ).

Included within the policy guidelines approved by the funding board shall be the procedure for determining the interest rate to be paid on investments of the treasury. Each time interest rates are changed, pursuant to the policy, the state treasurer shall report the change to the other members of the funding board.

In lieu of actual physical delivery of investments purchased pursuant to this section, the state treasurer may accept trust receipts therefor as provided in § 9-4-408.

In addition to the authority granted in subsection (a), the state funding board may, by resolution duly adopted, authorize the state treasurer to invest so much cash in the state treasury as it may deem appropriate in obligations of the state or any agency of the state maturing in not more than one (1) year from the date of such investment; provided, that the funding board has determined that such obligations could not otherwise be sold in traditional markets at reasonable rates of interest; and provided further, that the yield on such obligations is equal to or greater than, in the determination of the funding board with the concurrence of the state treasurer, the yield of other obligations in which the state could invest at that time under subsection (a). The funding board may, by resolution, establish guidelines and, within such guidelines, delegate the investment authority hereby conferred to the state treasurer. Such obligations, when so purchased, shall be turned over to the state treasurer, whose official bond shall be security for the safekeeping of such obligations. In lieu of actual physical delivery of such obligations so purchased, the state treasurer may accept trust receipts as provided in § 9-4-408.

The funding board and the governing boards of the respective state agencies may authorize the sale of obligations of the state and state agencies, respectively, to the state pursuant to the terms and conditions set forth in this section.

The state funding board is authorized to establish policy and procedure for investment of bond proceeds, as defined in subdivision (c)(2), in guaranteed investment contracts, including security requirements, if any. Prior to the adoption or promulgation by the state funding board of such policy and procedures, the entities listed in this subsection (c) may enter into such investments to the extent otherwise authorized by law. Nothing in this subsection (c) is intended to alter any existing authority in this chapter or in any other law otherwise providing authority for an investment entered into prior to the adoption or promulgation by the state funding board of such policies and procedures.

“Bond proceeds” means the proceeds from the sale of bonds, notes, and other obligations issued by the state funding board, the state school bond authority, the local development authority, state housing development agency and the state veterans' homes board, and reserves and funds maintained for debt service purposes.

A guaranteed investment contract is an authorized investment for bond proceeds if the guaranteed investment contract:

Has a defined termination date no later than five and one-half (5 ½) years from the date of issuance of the debt obligations, except for funds held in a debt service reserve fund, which shall be no later than the final maturity of the debt obligations; and

Complies with standards in the policy established by the state funding board, including creditworthiness.

The governing body of the entity shall, in the resolution or action authorizing the issuance of bonds, expressly authorize guaranteed investment contracts as an eligible investment.

In addition to the authority granted in subsection (a), the state funding board may, in accordance with policy guidelines approved by resolution of the board and duly acknowledged by the finance, ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the senate, authorize the state treasurer to enter into short-term arrangements or obligations not authorized elsewhere in this section for the sole purpose of meeting the liquidity needs of the pooled investment fund. The state treasurer shall report any such arrangements to the finance, ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the senate. Such arrangements or obligations shall not be used for the purposes of speculation, but shall only be used to meet operational liquidity requirements.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 42; 1988, ch. 602, § 1; 1989, ch. 448, §§ 1-3; 1990, ch. 702, § 3; 1996, ch. 621, §§ 16, 17; 2003, ch. 204, § 1; 2009, ch. 294, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 204, § 2, provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to that act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

9-4-603. Pooled investment fund.

There is hereby established the “pooled investment fund” for the purpose of receiving and investing any money in the custody of any officer or officers of the state unless prohibited by statute to be invested.

Participants in the fund under this section shall be deemed to be the general fund of the state and any department or agency of the state which is required by court order, contract, state or federal law or federal regulation to receive interest on invested funds and which are authorized by the state treasurer to participate in the fund.

The state treasurer shall administer the pooled investment fund on behalf of the participants in accordance with § 9-4-602 and shall have the authority to establish accounts and different classes of shares within the fund.

All investments purchased belong jointly to the participants in the fund and the participants will share capital gains, income, and losses pro rata.

The state shall keep a separate account, designated by name and number of each participant. Individual transactions and totals of all investments belonging to each participant shall be recorded in the accounts.

The state shall report monthly to every participant having a beneficial interest in the pooled investment fund. The report shall show the changes in investments made during the preceding month.

The state treasurer shall establish a revolving account, under the state treasurer's custody, to defray administrative costs of the pooled investment fund. The state treasurer may deduct from each participant's pro rata earnings through the fund a reasonable charge for administering the fund. In the event that the state treasurer does deduct an administrative fee, it shall be deposited and expended through the revolving account.

As the administrator of the pooled investment fund, the state treasurer is authorized to receive, invest and distribute a participant's funds by means of an electronic transfer or other reasonable methods. The state funding board may establish limits, restrictions or conditions on the acceptance of moneys into the fund and the withdrawal of moneys from the fund.

At any time, a participant in the fund may request the return of its principal investment or investment income or both; however, a redemption of shares does not guarantee that a participant will receive the entire amount of the principal investment or investment income or both.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 43; 2002, ch. 514, §§ 3, 4; 2013, ch. 208, §§ 1-3.

Cross-References. Participation in fund by educational institutions, §9-4-303.

Public deposit security trust fund, §9-4-514.

9-4-604. Payments to debtor of state.

No person shall draw any money from the public treasury until all debts, dues, and demands owing by such person to the state are first liquidated and paid off. The commissioner of finance and administration shall not issue any warrant upon the treasury in favor of a person in default until all of such person's arrearages to the treasury are audited and paid, otherwise than by allowing such defaulter or delinquent credits on the amounts of such person's delinquencies for such sum or sums as may at any time be due and owing to such person from the treasury. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, the commissioner may issue such a warrant upon the commissioner's determination that refusing to issue such a warrant would result in an interruption of essential services.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 44; 2004, ch. 931, § 1.

9-4-605. Issuance of duplicate warrants.

The commissioner of finance and administration may issue a duplicate warrant to any person to whom an original warrant was issued and which was lost, mislaid, or destroyed, in accordance with procedures established by the commissioner and approved by the state treasurer and comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 45.

9-4-606. Appropriation release requirements.

The commissioner of finance and administration is authorized to require the preparation and submission of work programs, financial reports and any other fiscal information the commissioner deems necessary before releasing any appropriations or grant to any agency, association, district, center, or other organization that is not under the direct control of an executive department or agency of state government.

The comptroller of the treasury is authorized and empowered to audit the fiscal records of any such agency, association, district, center or other such organization receiving state appropriations or grants.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 46.

9-4-607. Refunds of erroneously paid amounts.

With respect to any revenues or receipts collected by any department or agency with the exception of those collected by the department of revenue, other law to the contrary notwithstanding, such amounts as are determined to have been erroneously paid may be refunded by such procedure as shall be developed by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 47.

9-4-608. Intermediate-term investment fund.

The state funding board shall determine whether a need exists for a longer-term investment fund for funds in the custody of the state treasurer. Upon determining that such a need exists, the state funding board may, by resolution duly adopted, create an intermediate-term investment fund as an additional investment vehicle for money in the custody of any department or agency of the state which is required by court order, contract, state or federal law or federal regulation to receive interest on invested funds. The funding board shall establish the terms of participation in the fund, and shall set the minimum and maximum amounts which may be invested in the fund by each participant. The investment fund shall be administered by the state treasurer within the guidelines established by the funding board.

The authorized instruments for investment in the intermediate-term investment fund shall be those instruments contained in § 9-4-602, as well as the pooled investment fund set forth in § 9-4-603.

Any department or agency of the state which is required by court order, contract, state or federal law or federal regulation to receive interest on invested funds may apply with the state treasurer to participate in the fund. Upon approval of any such application and upon investment of cash in the fund, the respective department or agency shall be deemed a participant in the fund. The general fund of the state may also participate in the fund. A participant may invest its cash for any length of time in the fund; provided, that the funding board may establish restrictions for withdrawal and/or penalties for early withdrawal.

All securities purchased shall belong jointly to the participants in the fund and the participants will share capital gains, income, and losses pro rata.

The state treasurer shall keep a separate account, designated by name and number of each participant. Individual transactions and totals of all investments belonging to each participant shall be recorded in the accounts.

The state treasurer shall report monthly to every participant having a beneficial interest in the intermediate-term investment fund. The report shall show the changes in investments made during the preceding month.

The state treasurer shall establish a revolving account, under the state treasurer's custody, to defray administrative costs of the investment fund. The state treasurer may deduct from each participant's pro rata earnings through the fund, a reasonable charge for administering the fund. In the event that the state treasurer does deduct an administrative fee, it shall be deposited and expended through the revolving account.

The county legislative body shall determine whether a need exists for a longer-term investment for funds in the custody of the county trustee. Upon determining that such a need exists, the county legislative body may, by resolution duly adopted, authorize the county trustee to invest county funds in the state intermediate-term investment fund, notwithstanding § 5-8-301. The resolution shall contain a disclosure statement as the treasurer shall periodically require. County investments in the state intermediate-term investment fund shall be administered by the county trustee within the guidelines established.

Notwithstanding § 5-8-301, any entity that is eligible to participate in the pooled investment fund codified in § 9-4-603 may participate in the state intermediate-term investment fund.

Local governments may invest in the intermediate-term investment fund by having the local government's legislative body, council, commission or other authorizing individual or authorizing governing body submit a duly adopted resolution to the state treasurer demonstrating its authority to participate, along with any other documents required by the state treasurer. The resolution shall contain a disclosure statement as the state treasurer shall periodically require.

As the administrator of the intermediate-term investment fund, the state treasurer is authorized to receive, invest and distribute a participant's funds by means of an electronic transfer or other reasonable methods. The state funding board may establish limits, conditions or restrictions on the acceptance of moneys into the fund and the withdrawal of moneys from the fund.

Acts 1997, ch. 217, § 13; 2012, ch. 1002, § 1; 2013, ch. 208, §§ 4-7.

9-4-609. Restriction on expending public funds for advertising or public relations.

As used in this section, “public funds” means state revenues appropriated in the general appropriations act.

The general assembly finds that it is the public policy of this state that public funds shall not be obligated nor expended, nor shall a contract be entered into with an advertising, government affairs, or public relations firm, to promote, achieve, establish or restore a favorable relationship with the Tennessee public solely related to the image of any department, agency or office of the legislative, judicial or executive branch of government, when such advertising or public relations material, advertisement or communication provides no useful information, service or benefit to the public, unless such expenditure is included as a specific identifiable item in the general appropriations act.

The board of regents and the board of trustees shall develop policies governing the expenditure of public funds which, while promoting the respective institutions of higher education included within their systems and adequately informing the general public about the specific educational opportunities, nature and uniqueness of each institution, are not used to represent the institution as being superior to any other specific state public institution of higher education.

If a governmental entity has entered into a contract that includes the expenditure of funds prohibited under this section, the governmental entity shall immediately exercise any available cancellation clause in such contract that may be exercised related to such advertising or public relations material or communication.

Nothing in this section shall apply to funds appropriated in the general appropriations act to promote state agriculture, industry, trade, commerce, tourism or recreation or to participate in or promote conferences, training or similar meetings.

Acts 1999, ch. 260, § 1.

9-4-610. Tennessee interagency cash flow committee.

There is hereby created the Tennessee interagency cash flow committee, as an interagency committee, for the purpose of establishing, compiling and maintaining an eighteen-month forward rolling cash flow projection that projects on a monthly basis all material sources and all material uses of pooled investment fund cash projected to be received and expended by the state.

The committee shall consist of six (6) members as follows:

The state treasurer, or the state treasurer's designee;

One (1) staff person with the department of the treasury, designated by the state treasurer;

The comptroller of the treasury, or the comptroller's designee;

One (1) staff person with the comptroller of the treasury, designated by the comptroller;

The commissioner of finance and administration, or a staff person with the department of finance and administration, designated by the commissioner of finance and administration as the commissioner's designee; and

The commissioner of revenue, or a staff person with the department of revenue, designated by the commissioner of revenue as the commissioner's designee.

The state treasurer, or the state treasurer's designee, shall serve as chair of the committee.

All members of the committee serve at the will and pleasure of the authority designating such member.

The committee shall meet at the call of the state treasurer. The presence of a majority of the membership of the committee shall constitute a quorum. All actions of the committee shall be adopted upon a majority vote of the members of the committee who are participating in a meeting.

The committee shall, from time to time, determine the materiality of all items of sources and uses to be furnished by state entities, the materiality of those items to be included in the cash flow projection, the format of the cash flow projection, the categories of sources and uses to be included in such projection and any notes or explanatory statements to be included in the projection. The state tax revenue components of the projection shall be based on the official revenue estimates of the department of finance and administration in monthly units.

All state departments, agencies, boards, commissions, bureaus and instrumentalities, except the Tennessee board of regents and the University of Tennessee, shall promptly furnish to the committee periodically, or as otherwise requested, all requested information relating to sources and uses of pooled investment fund cash (historical and/or projected) in such form and format as the committee shall direct and which the committee deems necessary for the compilation and maintenance of the cash flow and state general fund earnings projections. Such requested information shall include estimates and other items necessary for projecting cash flow and earnings information relative to the various interest-bearing funds and accounts within the pooled investment fund, as well as information relative to the funds and amounts comprising the general fund's share of the pooled investment fund.

Commencing July 1, 2014, the state treasurer shall post monthly on the public website of the treasury department the latest version of the cash flow projection and any notes or explanatory statements accompanying such projection.

Acts 2011, ch. 346, § 1; 2013, ch. 20, § 3; 2017, ch. 324, §§ 3, 4.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee interagency cash flow committee, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

The URL of the public website of the Tennessee treasury department is http://www.treasury.tn.gov.

9-4-611. Compensation of members of state boards and commissions.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no member of any state board or commission established by law or pursuant to law, which receives an appropriation, regardless of the source of funding, shall receive any compensation, whether denominated per diem or by whatever name called, except for days in which such member actually works four (4) or more hours performing duties directly relating to that board's or commission's activities or for time or days spent attending meetings of that board or commission. This section shall not preclude payment of salaries which are set by law in annual or monthly amounts. The chair or head of each board or commission, the department head to which such board or commission is attached administratively, and the commissioner of finance and administration shall prescribe procedures to contain, as a minimum, a certification of time worked by each member claiming compensation.

Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 17.

9-4-612. Investments of state funds in obligations guaranteed by United States government.

Notwithstanding any requirement of this part, or any other law to the contrary, on and after April 22, 2015, the state treasurer may, in the state treasurer's sole discretion, invest money in the custody of any officer or officers of the state, which is otherwise required to be invested pursuant to § 9-4-603 or § 9-4-608, pursuant to this section, if the state officer or officers who have custody of the money request that the money be invested pursuant to this section.

Investments made pursuant to this section are not subject to § 9-4-602.

The authorized instruments for investment under this section shall be:

Bonds, notes, and treasury bills of the United States or any other obligations guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States or any of its agencies; and

Obligations guaranteed as to principal and interest by the federal home loan mortgage corporation, federal national mortgage association, student loan marketing association, and other United States government sponsored corporations.

Investments made pursuant to this section shall not be pooled, and each investor will bear the capital gains, income, and losses for that investor's investment.

The state treasurer shall keep a separate account, designated by name and number of each investor. Individual transactions and totals of all investments belonging to each investor shall be recorded in the accounts.

The state treasurer shall report monthly to every investor under this section. The report shall show any changes in investments made during the preceding month.

The state treasurer shall establish a revolving account, under the state treasurer's custody, to defray administrative costs, investment costs, and any other expenses associated with investments made pursuant to this section. The state treasurer may deduct from each investor's earnings, a reasonable charge for administering the investor's investment. In the event that the state treasurer does deduct an administrative fee, it shall be deposited and expended through the revolving account.

Subject to subdivision (h)(2), at any time, an investor may request the return of the investor's principal investment or investment income or both; however, a redemption of the investment does not guarantee that an investor will receive the entire amount of the principal investment or investment income or both.

In any case where an investor requests the return of an investment that will require liquidation of the investment prior to the investment reaching full maturity, the liquidation and return of the investment shall not be made unless the state treasurer approves the liquidation of the investment.

Acts 2015, ch. 196, § 1; 2018, ch. 909, § 1.